Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1583.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Maricopa counties; city of Tucson; school safety interoperability fund; return of monies On or before September 30, 2026, Maricopa county, the city of Yuma and the city of Tucson shall return to the department of administration any unexpended monies remaining from the distribution made from the school safety interoperability fund established by section 41-1733, Arizona Revised Statutes, pursuant to Laws 2021, chapter 408, section 89 and Laws 2022, chapter 313, section 5, and the department of administration shall deposit those monies in the school safety interoperability fund established by section 41-1733, Arizona Revised Statutes.